Washington statutes.
RCW 5.52.010

Deemed communications in writing.

Contracts made by telegraph shall be deemed to be contracts in writing; and all communications sent by telegraph and signed by the person or persons sending the same, or by his, her, or their authority, shall be held and deemed to be communications in writing.

[ 2011 c 336 s 139; Code 1881 s 2352; 1865 p 74 s 11; RRS s 11345.]